Hawaii statutes.
[§249-6.5] Exemption for National Guard,
military reserves, and other active duty military personnel claiming Hawaii as
their residence of record. One noncommercial motor vehicle registered to a
member of the National Guard, military reserve, or armed service, including the
Coast Guard, who is:

(1) Assigned to a unit in the State; and

(2) A member in good standing,

shall be exempt from the vehicle weight tax provided
for in this chapter. [L 2008, c 141, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next